Connecticut, session 2026, SB00062.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
___ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection, for the purpose of providing
grants-in-aid for the enhancement and extension of high-speed
broadband Internet access in rural communities.